Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1256
Service of petition and order.

Except as otherwise provided in section 43-1258, the petition and order shall be served, by any method authorized by the law of this state, upon the respondent and any person who has physical custody of the child.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 31.